Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2006.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) As used in this section, "security officer" means the
same as defined by K.S.A. 74-4914a(1)(a) and (b), and amendments
thereto.
(b) On and after July 1, 2025, the department of corrections shall be
an eligible employer as defined in K.S.A. 74-4952, and amendments
thereto, and shall affiliate on July 1, 2025, with the Kansas police and
firemen's retirement system established under K.S.A. 74-4951 et seq., and
amendments thereto, pursuant to the provisions of this section for
membership in the system for security officers who are employed by the
department of corrections. The department of corrections shall make
application for affiliation with such system in the manner provided by
K.S.A. 74-4954, and amendments thereto, to be effective on July 1 next
following application. The department of corrections shall affiliate for
membership in the system of such employees for participating service
credit.
(c) The division of the budget and the governor shall include in the
budget and in the budget request for appropriations for personnel services
the amount required to satisfy the employer's obligation under this section
as certified by the board of trustees of the system and shall present the
same to the legislature for allowance and appropriation. Upon affiliation,
the department of corrections shall pay to the system a sum sufficient to
satisfy such obligations as certified by the board.
(d) Except for participating service credit purchases authorized by
section 2, and amendments thereto, the determination of retirement, death
or disability benefits shall be computed upon the basis of credited service,
as used in K.S.A. 74-4951 et seq., and amendments thereto, but shall
include only participating service with the department of corrections,

HB 2006 2
commencing on and after the effective date of affiliation by the department
of corrections with the Kansas police and firemen's retirement system.
(e) The provisions of K.S.A. 74-4988, and amendments thereto, shall
apply to any security officer who becomes a member of the Kansas police
and firemen's retirement system pursuant to this section.
(f) Every person who is employed as a security officer on or after the
entry date of the department of corrections into the Kansas police and
firemen's retirement system shall become a member of the Kansas police
and firemen's retirement system.
(g) Except as otherwise provided by this act, any security officer
employed by the department of corrections who becomes a member of the
Kansas police and firemen's retirement system shall be subject to the
provisions of K.S.A. 74-4951 through 74-4970, and amendments thereto.
(h) Beginning with the first payment of compensation for services of
a security officer after becoming a member of the Kansas police and
firemen's retirement system, the employer shall deduct from the
compensation of such member 7.15% as the employee contribution to the
system. Such deductions shall be remitted, deposited and credited as
provided in K.S.A. 74-4965, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. (a) Subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 74-49,123, and
amendments thereto, any security officer who becomes a member of the
Kansas police and firemen's retirement system pursuant to section 1, and
amendments thereto, and who has not retired, may purchase participating
service credit for periods of active service as a security officer of the
department of corrections in the Kansas public employees retirement
system at an additional rate of contribution, in addition to the employee's
rate of contribution as provided in K.S.A. 74-4965, and amendments
thereto, and section 1, and amendments thereto. All such service credit
purchased shall be recredited to the Kansas police and firemen's retirement
system. Such additional rate of contribution shall be based upon the
security officer's attained age at the time of purchase and using actuarial
assumptions and tables in use by the retirement system at such time of
purchase for such periods of service. Such additional rate of contribution
shall commence at the beginning of the quarter following such election
and shall remain in effect until all of the full quarters of such service have
been purchased.
(b) (1) Subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 74-49,123, and
amendments thereto, any security officer who becomes a member of the
Kansas police and firemen's retirement system pursuant to section 1, and
amendments thereto, and who has not retired, may purchase participating
service credit for periods of active service as a security officer of the
department of corrections in the Kansas public employees retirement
system by electing to effect such purchase by means of a single lump-sum

HB 2006 3
payment in lieu of employee contributions as provided in subsection (a).
All such service credit purchased shall be recredited to the Kansas police
and firemen's retirement system.
(2) The lump-sum payment shall be an amount determined by the
actuary using:
(A) The member's then current annual rate of compensation or the
member's final average salary at the time the member elects to purchase
such service credit, whichever is greater;
(B) the actuarial assumptions and tables currently in use by the
retirement system; and
(C) the member's attained age.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.